Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.110

Regents—Secretary—Treasurer—Duties—Treasurer's bond.

The board shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer who shall hold their respective offices during the pleasure of the board and carry out such respective duties as the board shall prescribe. In addition to such other duties as the board prescribes, the secretary shall record all proceedings of the board and carefully preserve the same. The treasurer shall give bond for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office in such amount as the regents may require: PROVIDED, That the university shall pay the fee for such bond.

[ 2011 c 336 s 718; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.110. Prior: 1890 p 396 s 6; RRS s 4556. Formerly RCW 28.77.110.]